Illinois, session 104th, SB472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hotel and Casino Employee Safety Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 325/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Hotel and Casino Employee Safety Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 3-1-21 (See Section 50 of P.A. 11101-639 for effective date of P.A. 101-221).)